Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1209
Penalty imposed; judicial review.

Any penalty imposed by any collegiate athletic association, college, or university shall be subject to judicial review in the district court.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 9.